dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xB ver pion [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB ver bion [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB aver epion aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB er one [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB ver pione [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB ver bione [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB aver epione aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB er ion [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB er ione [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB r n [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver pien [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver bien [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB aver epien aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB r ne [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver piene [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver biene [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB aver epiene aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB er é [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xB ver pié [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xB ver bié [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xB aver epié aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xB r de [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB ver piede [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB ver biede [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB aver epiede aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB r ge [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB ver piege [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB aver éde aver	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T11 + (is)ié([dg]e)
SFX xB ver biege [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB aver epiege aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xB 0 e [aʼ]ver	ds:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e)
SFX xB er area [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + réa
SFX xB er aríimo [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + ríimo
SFX xB er area [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + réa
SFX xB er aresi [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xB er arisi [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési, padoan
SFX xB er area [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + réa
SFX xB aver ò/J1I1 aver	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + (g)ò
SFX xB aver à/J1I1 aver	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + (g)à
SFX xB aver è/J3I3 aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + è
SFX xB aver èi aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + è
SFX xB aver ès/J3I3 aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + è, belumat
SFX xB aver es/J3I3 aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, belumat
SFX xB aver àpia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver àbia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èpia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver è/J1I1 aver	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + è
SFX xB aver à/J3I3 aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + (g)à, 2s=3
SFX xB aver às/J3I3 aver	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + (g)à, 2s=3
SFX xB aver à aver	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + (g)à
SFX xB aver àpie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver àbie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver èpie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver èpe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver ébe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver àbe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB aver àpi aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xB r 0 [aʼ]ver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver àpie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver àbie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver èpie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver èpe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver ébe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xB aver àbi aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i, 2s=3
SFX xB aver èbi aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i, 2s=3, coxòto
SFX xB aver àbia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + a, 2s=3
SFX xB aver àpia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver àbia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èpia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èpie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èpe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èbe aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver ébia aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver à/V0V3V4V5V6 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular	# T9
SFX xB aver àge/R1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB aver à-l/J5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver à-ƚo/j5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àl/I5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àƚo/i5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àgel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB aver àgeƚo/R3A1	aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbi/V3V4V5V6 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular	# T9
SFX xB aver àbe/V0|| aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbi-l/J5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbi-ƚo/j5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbil/I5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbiƚo/i5 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbegel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB aver àbegeƚo/R3A1	aver	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xB er émogel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er ímogel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er émogeƚo/R3A1	aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er ímogeƚo/R3A1	aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er on/V0V3V4 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xB er ónge/R1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xB er óngel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xB r n/V0V3V4 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xB er énge/R1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xB er éngel/R2A1 aver	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xB er évami/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB aver évami/I1 aver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er éami/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB aver éami/I1 aver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er évomi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xB er éomi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xB er évitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er éitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB ver éitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er évïu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er éiu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er ívitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er íitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB ver íitu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er ívïu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er íiu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xB er éndoge/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndege/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éntoge/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB 0 émoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB 0 ímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB 0 àvemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àvemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àvetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àveu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àeu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er émoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + (g)avémo
SFX xB er ímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + avímo
SFX xB r a [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r e-l/J5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r e-ƚo/j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er ével/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éel/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éa [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver ée-l/J5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver ée-ƚo/j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er éel/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r ndo/V3V4V5V6 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogel/P2A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogeƚo/P3 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB r nde/V3V4V5V6 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éndegel/P2A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
